Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-724
Property of minor, mentally incompetent person, married person whose spouse is under guardianship or conservatorship; authority of guardian or conservator.

Notwithstanding any more general or special law respecting sale or conveyance of lands, real estate, real or personal property, or any interests therein now or hereafter owned by any minor, mentally incompetent person, any married person whose spouse is under guardianship or conservatorship, or any persons under conservatorship, the guardian of such minor or mentally incompetent person, such married person with the guardian of such spouse, the conservator of such persons, or any married person with the conservator of such spouse may execute deeds or other instruments for the conveyance of any lands, real or personal property, or any interests therein of such minors, mentally incompetent persons under guardianship, or such persons under conservatorship to the condemner for public purposes upon payment of just compensation by the condemner or, in the event of condemnation, may agree and settle with the condemner for all damages or claims by reason of the taking of the property and may give valid releases and discharges therefor.

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 24, p. 457;

Laws 1967, c. 482, § 2, p. 1494;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 32.